Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1477
Contributions
from persons other than committee; information required; violation; penalty.

No person shall receive a contribution from a person other
than a committee unless, for purposes of the recipient person's record-keeping
and reporting requirements, the contribution is accompanied by the name and
address of each person who contributed more
than one hundred dollars to the contribution. Any person violating the provisions
of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 77;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 50;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 23;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 32.